Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Right to mental data. new text end new text begin (a) An individual has the right to mental privacy. A government entity must not, without informed consent, collect data transcribed directly from brain activity. new text end new text begin (b) An individual has the right to cognitive liberty. A government entity must not interfere with the free and competent decision making of the individual when making neurotechnology decisions. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [325E.85] NEUROTECHNOLOGY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Brain-computer interface" means a device that enables its user to interact with a computer by means of brain activity only. new text end new text begin (c) "Consciousness bypass" means the use of neurotechnology to manipulate brain activity by applying electrical or optical stimuli without the conscious awareness of the person whose brain activity is being manipulated. new text end new text begin (d) "Neurotechnology" means the assembly of methods and instruments that enable a direct connection of technical components with the nervous system. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Neurotechnology rights. new text end new text begin (a) An individual has the right to change one's decisions regarding neurotechnology and the right to determine by what means to change that decision. new text end new text begin (b) An individual has the right to mental integrity and is afforded protection from neurotechnological interventions of the mind and from unauthorized access to or manipulation of an individual's brain activity. new text end new text begin (c) An individual has the right to psychological continuity and is afforded protection from unauthorized neurotechnological alterations in mental functions critical to personality. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Data collection consent. new text end new text begin Each time an individual connects to a brain-computer interface, the company responsible for recording and storing the data must provide notice of (1) the uses that the data may be used for by the company, and (2) the third parties with which the data will be shared. Before the data may be used or shared, the individual must provide consent for each use and third party. The individual must approve each use and third party using a separate consent form. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Consciousness bypass prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a company must not use a brain-computer interface to bypass conscious decision making by the individual. new text end new text begin (b) An individual may provide informed consent before a medical procedure designed to bypass conscious decision making. Consent obtained by using a consciousness bypass is not informed consent. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Enforcement; civil penalty. new text end new text begin A company that violates subdivision 3 or 4 is subject to a civil penalty of up to $10,000 per incident. The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover civil penalties as provided in this subdivision. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.88, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Penalty. Whoever commits computer damage may be sentenced as follows: (a) to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $50,000, or both, ifnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end the damage, destructionnew text begin ,new text end or alteration results in a loss in excess of $2,500, to the owner, or the owner's agent, or lessee;new text begin ornew text end new text begin (2) the damage, destruction, or alteration occurs to a computer having a brain-computer interface, regardless of the value of the loss; new text end (b) to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if the damage, destruction or alteration results in a loss of more than $500, but not more than $2,500 to the owner, or the owner's agent or lessee; or (c) in all other cases to imprisonment for not more than 90 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $1,000, or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for crimes committed on or after August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.891, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Gross misdemeanor. (a) A person who violates subdivision 1 in a manner that creates a risk to public health and safety is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be sentenced to imprisonment for a term of not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both. (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 in a manner that compromises the security of data that are protected under section 609.52, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (8), or are not public data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 8a, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be sentenced under paragraph (a). (c) A person who violates subdivision 1 and gains access to personal data is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be sentenced under paragraph (a). (d) A person who is convicted of a second or subsequent misdemeanor violation of subdivision 1 within five years is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be sentenced under paragraph (a). (e) A person who violates subdivision 1 by accessing, or attempting to access, an electronic terminal through opening, or attempting to open, any panel or access door without authorization is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be sentenced under paragraph (a). new text begin (f) A person who violates subdivision 1 and gains access to a system that includes a brain-computer interface is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and may be sentenced under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for crimes committed on or after August 1, 2025. new text end